Hawaii statutes.
[§641-32] Liability on bond, how enforced.
[(a)] By entering into a bond for costs or to stay the execution of any
proceedings to enforce a judgment, the surety submits oneself to the
jurisdiction of the court, irrevocably appoints the clerk of the court as the
surety's agent upon whom any papers affecting the surety's liability on the
bond may be served, and agrees that the surety's liability may be enforced on
motion without the necessity of an independent action.

[(b)] The papers served on the clerk as
statutory agent for the surety shall be mailed by the clerk to the surety if
the surety's address is known. [L 1895, c 25, §4; RL 1925, §2540; RL 1935,
§3508; RL 1945, §9510; RL 1955, §208-10; HRS §641-45; am L 1972, c 89, pt of
§5; ren HRS §641-32; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next